Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.800

Referendum only measure for taxes for stadium and exhibition center—Limiting legislation upon failure to approve—1997 c 220.

The referendum on this act is the only measure authorizing, levying, or imposing taxes for a stadium and exhibition center that may be put to a public vote. Should the act fail to be approved at the special election on or before June 20, 1997, the legislature shall not pass other legislation to build or finance a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, for the team affiliate.

[ 1997 c 220 s 604 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]